Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.670

Agency employee records—Model policies.

By January 1, 2020, the attorney general, in consultation with state agencies, shall create model policies for the implementation of chapter 373, Laws of 2019.

[ 2019 c 373 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—2019 c 373: See notes following RCW 42.56.660.